ro-RO: Accesorii incluse cu jucăria cu bule: Soluție pentru baloane; Tavă/vas pentru soluție de baloane; Curea de transport; Pâlnie; Baghete/Inele de rezervă; Autocolante/Abțibilduri; Altele
it: Giocattolo per bolle di sapone con accessori inclusi: Liquido per bolle; Vassoio/piattino per liquido per bolle; Cinghia per il trasporto; Imbuto; Bacchette/anelli di ricambio; Adesivi/decalcomanie; Altro
tr: Baloncuk oyuncağı dahil aksesuarlar: Köpük solüsyonu; Köpük solüsyon tepsisi/tabağı; Taşıma askısı; Huni; Yedek çubuklar/halkalar; Çıkartmalar/etiketler; Diğer
lt-LT: Įtraukti burbulų žaislo aksesuarų daiktai: Burbulų skystis; Burbulų skysčio padėklas / indas; Nešiojimo dirželis; Piltuvėlis; Pakaitiniai pūtimo žiedeliai / žiedai; Lipdukai / dekolės; Kiti
sk-SK: Bublinová hračka je súčasťou príslušenstva: Roztok na bubliny; Podnos/miska na roztok; Popruh na prenášanie; Lievik; Náhradné prútiky/krúžky; Nálepky/obtlačky; Iné
nl: Bellenspeelgoed meegeleverde accessoires: Bellenblaassop; Bakje/schaaltje voor bellenblaassop; Draagriem; Trechter; Vervangende staven/ringen; Stickers; Overig
el: Παιχνίδι με φούσκες που περιλαμβάνει αξεσουάρ: Υγρό για φούσκες; Δίσκος/πιατάκι υγρού για φούσκες; Ιμάντας μεταφοράς; Χωνί; Ανταλλακτικά ραβδιά/δακτύλιοι; Αυτοκόλλητα/χαλκομανίες; Άλλο
fr: Accessoires inclus avec le jouet à bulles: Liquide à bulles; Bac/récipient à liquide à bulles; Sangle de transport; Entonnoir; Baguettes/anneaux de rechange; Autocollants/décalcomanies; Autre
fi: Kuplalelun mukana tulevat lisävarusteet: Kuplaneste; Kuplanestealusta/-astia; Kantohihna; Suppilo; Vaihtosauvat/-renkaat; Tarrat/siirtokuvat; Muu
ja: バブルトイに含まれるアクセサリー: シャボン玉液; シャボン玉液トレイ/受け皿; キャリーストラップ; 漏斗; 交換用ワンド/リング; ステッカー/デカール; その他
hu: Buborékfújó játék mellékelt tartozékai: Buborékfolyadék; Buborékfolyadék-tálca/tál; Hordozópánt; Tölcsér; Csere-fújók/gyűrűk; Matricák; Egyéb
ko: 포함된 버블 장난감 액세서리: 비눗방울 용액; 비눗방울 용액 트레이/접시; 휴대용 스트랩; 깔때기; 교체용 막대/링; 스티커/데칼; 기타
zh-CN: 泡泡玩具包含配件: 泡泡液; 泡泡液托盘/盘子; 提带; 漏斗; 替换泡泡棒/环; 贴纸/贴花; 其他
pl: Akcesoria do zabawki do baniek w zestawie: Płyn do baniek; Tacka/pojemnik na płyn do baniek; Pasek do przenoszenia; Lejek; Zapasowe różdżki/pierścienie; Naklejki/kalkomanie; Inne
de: Im Lieferumfang des Seifenblasenspielzeugs enthaltenes Zubehör: Seifenblasenlösung; Schale/Behälter für Seifenblasenlösung; Tragegurt; Trichter; Ersatzstäbe/-ringe; Aufkleber/Sticker; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Igračka s mjehurićima uključena u pribor: Otopina za mjehuriće; Pladanj/posuda za otopinu za mjehuriće; Remen za nošenje; Lijevak; Zamjenski štapići/prstenovi; Naljepnice/preslikači; Ostalo
sv: Bubbelleksak inkluderade tillbehör: Bubbelvätska; Bricka/fat för bubbelvätska; Bärrem; Tratt; Reservstavar/-ringar; Klistermärken/dekaler; Övrigt
cs: Příslušenství dodávané k bublifukové hračce: Roztok na bubliny; Podnos/miska na roztok; Popruh na přenášení; Trychtýř; Náhradní hůlky/kroužky; Nálepky/obtisky; Jiné
en: Bubble toy included accessories: Bubble solution; Bubble solution tray/dish; Carrying strap; Funnel; Replacement wands/rings; Stickers/decals; Other
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมที่มาพร้อมของเล่นเป่าฟองสบู่: น้ำยาสบู่; ถาด/จานใส่น้ำยา; สายสะพาย; กรวย; ก้าน/วงแหวนเป่าฟองอะไหล่; สติกเกอร์/รูปลอก; อื่นๆ
da: Medfølgende tilbehør til boblelegetøj: Sæbeboblevand; Bakke/skål til sæbeboblevand; Bærestrop; Tragt; Ekstra stave/ringe; Klistermærker/dekaler; Andet
sl-SI: Priloženi dodatki za igračo z mehurčki: Tekočina za mehurčke; Pladenj/posoda za tekočino za mehurčke; Trak za nošenje; Lijak; Nadomestne palčke/obroči; Nalepke; Drugo
pt-BR: Acessórios incluídos com o brinquedo de bolhas: Solução para bolhas; Bandeja/prato de solução para bolhas; Alça de transporte; Funil; Bastões/anéis de reposição; Adesivos/decalques; Outros
vi: Phụ kiện đi kèm đồ chơi bong bóng: Dung dịch tạo bong bóng; Khay/đĩa đựng dung dịch tạo bong bóng; Dây đeo; Phễu; Que/vòng thổi thay thế; Nhãn dán/đề can; Khác
bg-BG: Аксесоари с включени играчки с балончета: Течност за балончета; Тавичка/чинийка за течност; Презрамка за носене; Фуния; Резервни пръчици/пръстени; Стикери/лепенки; Друго
es: Accesorios incluidos con el juguete de burbujas: Solución de burbujas; Bandeja/plato para solución de burbujas; Correa de transporte; Embudo; Varitas/anillos de repuesto; Pegatinas/calcomanías; Otro
ru: Аксессуары в комплекте с игрушкой для пузырей: Раствор для мыльных пузырей; Лоток/емкость для раствора; Ремень для переноски; Воронка; Запасные палочки/кольца; Наклейки; Другое
nb: Boblelek inkludert tilbehør: Boblesåpe; Brett/skål til boblesåpe; Bærestropp; Trakt; Ekstra pinner/ringer; Klistremerker/dekaler; Annet
zh-TW: 泡泡玩具包含配件: 泡泡水; 泡泡水托盤/碟子; 背帶; 漏斗; 替換吹泡棒/環; 貼紙/轉印貼紙; 其他
pt-PT: Brinquedo de bolas de sabão com acessórios incluídos: Líquido para bolhas; Tabuleiro/prato de líquido para bolhas; Alça de transporte; Funil; Aros/varinhas de substituição; Autocolantes/decalques; Outro